errortag-src/numeral-sme-lex.txt
LEXICON GAVCCILOGIVIHTTA
vihtta+Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#logi#vihtta%> K ;
vihtta+Num+Ess:%>#logi#vihttan%> K ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Acc:%>#logi#vihtta%> K ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Gen:%>#logi#viđa%>  K ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Gen:%>#logi#viđa»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Loc:%>#logi#viđa%>s K ;
 vihtta+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>#logi#viđa%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
vihtta+Num+Sg+Ill:%>#logi#vihtti%>j K ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#viđa%>jn K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Nom:%>#logi#viđa%>t K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Acc:%>#logi#viđa%>X5jd K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Gen:%>#logi#viđa%>X5jd K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Ill:%>#logi#viđa%>jde K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#viđa%>jn K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Com:%>#logi#viđa%>jguin K ;


LEXICON GUOKTELOGIVIHTTA
vihtta+Num+Sg+Nom:e%>#logi#vihtta%> K ;
vihtta+Num+Ess:e%>#logi#vihtta%>n K ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Acc:e%>#logi#vihtta%> K ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Gen:e%>#logi#viđa%> K ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Gen:e%>#logi#viđa»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Loc:e%>#logi#viđa%>s K ;
 vihtta+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:e%>#logi#viđa%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
vihtta+Num+Sg+Ill:e%>#logi#vihtti%>j K ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#logijn#viđa%>jn K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Nom:e%>#logi#viđa%>t K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Acc:e%>#logi#viđa%>X5jd K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Gen:e%>#logi#viđa%>X5jd K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Ill:e%>#logi#viđa%>jde K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#logijn#viđa%>jn K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Com:e%>#logi#viđa%>guin K ;

LEXICON VIHTTALOGIVIHTTA
vihtta+Num+Sg+Nom:ihtta%>#logi#vihtta%> K ;
vihtta+Num+Ess:htta%>#logi#vihtta%>n K ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Acc:htta%>#logi#vihtta%> K ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Gen:htta%>#logi#viđa%> K ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Gen:htta%>#logi#viđa»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Loc:htta%>#logi#viđa%>s K ;
 vihtta+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:htta%>#logi#viđa%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
vihtta+Num+Sg+Ill:htta%>#logi#vihtti%>j K ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#logijn#viđa%>jn K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Nom:htta%>#logi#viđa%>t K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Acc:htta%>#logi#viđa%>X5jd K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Gen:htta%>#logi#viđa%>X5jd K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Ill:htta%>#logi#viđa%>jde K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#logijn#viđa%>jn K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Com:htta%>#logi#viđa%>jguin K ;

LEXICON GOLBMALOGIGUHTTA
guhtta+Num+Sg+Nom:%>#logi#guhtta%> K ;
guhtta+Num+Ess:%>#logi#guhtta%>n K ;
guhtta+Num+Sg+Acc:%>#logi#guhtta%> K ;
guhtta+Num+Sg+Gen:%>#logi#guđa%>  K ;
guhtta+Num+Sg+Gen:%>#logi#guđa»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
guhtta+Num+Sg+Loc:%>#logi#guđa%>s K ;
 guhtta+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>#logi#guđa%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
guhtta+Num+Sg+Ill:%>#logi#guhtti%>j K ;
guhtta+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#guđa%>jn K ;
guhtta+Num+Pl+Nom:%>#logi#guđa%>t K ;
guhtta+Num+Pl+Acc:%>#logi#guđa%>X5jd K ;
guhtta+Num+Pl+Gen:%>#logi#guđa%>X5jd K ;
guhtta+Num+Pl+Ill:%>#logi#guđa%>jde K ;
guhtta+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#guđa%>jn K ;
guhtta+Num+Pl+Com:%>#logi#guđa%>jguin K ;

LEXICON GAVCCILOGIGUHTTA
guhtta+Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#logi#guhtta%> K ;
guhtta+Num+Ess:%>#logi#guhtta%>n K ;
guhtta+Num+Sg+Acc:%>#logi#guhtta%> K ;
guhtta+Num+Sg+Gen:%>#logi#guđa%>  K ;
guhtta+Num+Sg+Gen:%>#logi#guđa»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
guhtta+Num+Sg+Loc:%>#logi#guđa%>s K ;
 guhtta+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>#logi#guđa%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
guhtta+Num+Sg+Ill:%>#logi#guhtti%>j K ;
guhtta+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#guđa%>jn K ;
guhtta+Num+Pl+Nom:%>#logi#guđa%>t K ;
guhtta+Num+Pl+Acc:%>#logi#guđa%>X5jd K ;
guhtta+Num+Pl+Gen:%>#logi#guđa%>X5jd K ;
guhtta+Num+Pl+Ill:%>#logi#guđa%>jde K ;
guhtta+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#guđa%>jn K ;
guhtta+Num+Pl+Com:%>#logi#guđa%>jguin K ;


LEXICON GUOKTELOGIGUHTTA
guhtta+Num+Sg+Nom:e%>#logi#guhtta%> K ;
guhtta+Num+Ess:e%>#logi#guhtta%>n K ;
guhtta+Num+Sg+Acc:e%>#logi#guhtta%> K ;
guhtta+Num+Sg+Gen:e%>#logi#guđa%> K ;
guhtta+Num+Sg+Gen:e%>#logi#guđa»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
guhtta+Num+Sg+Loc:e%>#logi#guđa%>s K ;
 guhtta+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:e%>#logi#guđa%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
guhtta+Num+Sg+Ill:e%>#logi#guhtti%>j K ;
guhtta+Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#logijn#guđa%>jn K ;
guhtta+Num+Pl+Nom:e%>#logi#guđa%>t K ;
guhtta+Num+Pl+Acc:e%>#logi#guđa%>X5jd K ;
guhtta+Num+Pl+Gen:e%>#logi#guđa%>X5jd K ;
guhtta+Num+Pl+Ill:e%>#logi#guđa%>jde K ;
guhtta+Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#logijn#guđa%>jn K ;
guhtta+Num+Pl+Com:e%>#logi#guđa%>guin K ;

LEXICON VIHTTALOGIGUHTTA
guhtta+Num+Sg+Nom:ihtta%>#logi#guhtta%> K ;
guhtta+Num+Ess:htta%>#logi#guhtta%>n K ;
guhtta+Num+Sg+Acc:htta%>#logi#guhtta%> K ;
guhtta+Num+Sg+Gen:htta%>#logi#guđa%> K ;
guhtta+Num+Sg+Gen:htta%>#logi#guđa»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
guhtta+Num+Sg+Loc:htta%>#logi#guđa%>s K ;
 guhtta+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:htta%>#logi#guđa%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
guhtta+Num+Sg+Ill:htta%>#logi#guhtti%>j K ;
guhtta+Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#logijn#guđa%>jn K ;
guhtta+Num+Pl+Nom:htta%>#logi#guđa%>t K ;
guhtta+Num+Pl+Acc:htta%>#logi#guđa%>X5jd K ;
guhtta+Num+Pl+Gen:htta%>#logi#guđa%>X5jd K ;
guhtta+Num+Pl+Ill:htta%>#logi#guđa%>jde K ;
guhtta+Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#logijn#guđa%>jn K ;
guhtta+Num+Pl+Com:htta%>#logi#guđa%>jguin K ;

LEXICON GOLBMALOGICIEZA
čieža+Num+Sg+Nom:%>#logi#čieža%> K ;
čieža+Num+Ess:%>#logi#čieža%>n K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Acc:%>#logi#čieža%> K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Gen:%>#logi#čieža%>  K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Gen:%>#logi#čieža»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Loc:%>#logi#čieža%>s K ;
 čieža+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>#logi#čieža%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
čieža+Num+Sg+Ill:%>#logi#čihčči%>j K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Ill:%>#logi#čihči%>j K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Ill:%>#logi#čiži%>j K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#čieža%>jn K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Nom:%>#logi#čieža%>t K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Acc:%>#logi#čieža%>X5jd K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Gen:%>#logi#čieža%>X5jd K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Ill:%>#logi#čieža%>jde K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#čieža%>jn K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Com:%>#logi#čieža%>jguin K ;

LEXICON GAVCCILOGICIEZA
čieža+Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#logi#čieža%> K ;
čieža+Num+Ess:%>#logi#čieža%>n K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Acc:%>#logi#čieža%> K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Gen:%>#logi#čieža%>  K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Gen:%>#logi#čieža»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Loc:%>#logi#čieža%>s K ;
 čieža+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>#logi#čieža%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
čieža+Num+Sg+Ill:%>#logi#čihčči%>j K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Ill:%>#logi#čihči%>j K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Ill:%>#logi#čiži%>j K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#čieža%>jn K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Nom:%>#logi#čieža%>t K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Acc:%>#logi#čieža%>X5jd K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Gen:%>#logi#čieža%>X5jd K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Ill:%>#logi#čieža%>jde K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#čieža%>jn K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Com:%>#logi#čieža%>jguin K ;


LEXICON GUOKTELOGICIEZA
čieža+Num+Sg+Nom:e%>#logi#čieža%> K ;
čieža+Num+Ess:e%>#logi#čieža%>n K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Acc:e%>#logi#čieža%> K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Gen:e%>#logi#čieža%> K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Gen:e%>#logi#čieža»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Loc:e%>#logi#čieža%>s K ;
 čieža+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:e%>#logi#čieža%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
čieža+Num+Sg+Ill:e%>#logi#čihčči%>j K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Ill:e%>#logi#čihči%>j K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Ill:e%>#logi#čiži%>j K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#logijn#čieža%>jn K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Nom:e%>#logi#čieža%>t K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Acc:e%>#logi#čieža%>X5jd K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Gen:e%>#logi#čieža%>X5jd K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Ill:e%>#logi#čieža%>jde K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#logijn#čieža%>jn K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Com:e%>#logi#čieža%>jguin K ;

LEXICON VIHTTALOGICIEZA
čieža+Num+Sg+Nom:ihtta%>#logi#čieža%> K ;
čieža+Num+Ess:htta%>#logi#čieža%>n K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Acc:htta%>#logi#čieža%> K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Gen:htta%>#logi#čieža%> K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Gen:htta%>#logi#čieža»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Loc:htta%>#logi#čieža%>s K ;
 čieža+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:htta%>#logi#čieža%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
čieža+Num+Sg+Ill:htta%>#logi#čihčči%>j K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Ill:htta%>#logi#čihči%>j K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Ill:htta%>#logi#čiži%>j K ;
čieža+Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#logijn#čieža%>jn K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Nom:htta%>#logi#čieža%>t K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Acc:htta%>#logi#čieža%>X5jd K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Gen:htta%>#logi#čieža%>X5jd K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Ill:htta%>#logi#čieža%>jde K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#logijn#čieža%>jn K ;
čieža+Num+Pl+Com:htta%>#logi#čieža%>jguin K ;

LEXICON 21TO99
guok0te#logi#:guok't GUOKTELOGIVIHTTA ;
guok0te#logi#:guok't GUOKTELOGIGUHTTA ;
guok0te#logi#:guok't GUOKTELOGICIEZA ;
golbma#logi#:golbma GOLBMALOGIGUHTTA ;
golbma#logi#:golbma GOLBMALOGICIEZA ;
njeallje#logi#:njeallj GUOKTELOGIVIHTTA ;
njeallje#logi#:njeallj GUOKTELOGIGUHTTA ;
njeallje#logi#:njeallj GUOKTELOGICIEZA ;
vihtta#logi#:vi VIHTTALOGIVIHTTA ;
vihtta#logi#:vi VIHTTALOGIGUHTTA ;
vihtta#logi#:vi VIHTTALOGICIEZA ;
guhtta#logi#:gu VIHTTALOGIVIHTTA ;
guhtta#logi#:gu VIHTTALOGIGUHTTA ;
guhtta#logi#:gu VIHTTALOGICIEZA ;
čieža#logi#:čieža GOLBMALOGIGUHTTA ;
gieža#logi#:gieža GOLBMALOGIGUHTTA ;
čieža#logi#:čieža GOLBMALOGICIEZA ;
gieža#logi#:gieža GOLBMALOGICIEZA ;
gávcci#logi#:gák'ci GAVCCILOGIVIHTTA ;
gávcci#logi#:gák'ci GAVCCILOGIGUHTTA ;
gávcci#logi#:gák'ci GAVCCILOGICIEZA ;
ovcci#logi#:ok'ci GAVCCILOGIVIHTTA ;
ovcci#logi#:ok'ci GAVCCILOGIGUHTTA ;
ovcci#logi#:ok'ci GAVCCILOGICIEZA ;
